Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 25, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 25. Whenever any measure shall be initiated by the
people in the manner provided by law, or whenever the referendum
shall be demanded against any measure passed by the Legislature,
same shall be submitted to the people for their approval or
rejection at the next regular general election; provided, the
Governor shall have power, in his discretion, to call a special
election to vote upon such questions, or to designate the mandatory
primary election as a special election for such purpose the official
ballot title and measure is transmitted from the Secretary of State
Req. No. 11674 Page 1

to t he State Election Board not fewer than seventy (70) days from
the date of the next general election pursuant to Section 12-116 of
Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11674 MAH 01/07/25


















Req. No. 11674 Page 2